Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2540.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Title 30, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes and title 40, chapter 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, are repealed. Sec. 2. Section 47-9109, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE47-9109. Scope A. Except as otherwise provided in subsections C and D of this section, this chapter applies to: 1. A transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract; 2. An agricultural lien; 3. A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes; 4. A consignment; 5. A security interest arising under section 47-2401 or 47-2505, section 47-2711, subsection C or section 47-2A508, subsection E, as provided in section 47-9110; and 6. A security interest arising under section 47-4210 or 47-5118. B. The application of this article to a security interest in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to which this chapter does not apply. C. This chapter does not apply to the extent that: 1. A statute, regulation or treaty of the United States preempts this article; 2. A statute of a foreign country or a governmental unit of a foreign country, other than a statute generally applicable to security interests, expressly governs creation, perfection, priority or enforcement of a security interest created by that country or governmental unit; or 3. The rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated person under a letter of credit are independent and superior under section 47-5114. D. This chapter does not apply to: 1. A landlord's lien, other than an agricultural lien; 2. A lien, other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or other rule of law for services or materials, but section 47-9333 applies with respect to priority of the lien; 3. An assignment of a claim for wages, salary or other compensation of an employee; 4. A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes as part of a sale of the business out of which they arose; 5. An assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes that is for the purpose of collection only; 6. An assignment of a right to payment under a contract to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the contract; 7. An assignment of a single account, payment intangible or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness; 8. A transfer of an interest in or an assignment of a claim under a policy of insurance, other than an assignment by or to a health care provider of a health-care-insurance receivable and any subsequent assignment of the right to payment, but sections 47-9315 and 47-9322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds; 9. An assignment of a right represented by a judgment, other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was collateral; 10. A right of recoupment or setoff, but: (a) Section 47-9340 applies with respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or setoff against deposit accounts; and (b) Section 47-9404 applies with respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor; 11. The creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on real property, including a lease or rents thereunder, except to the extent that provision is made for: (a) Liens on real property in sections 47-9203 and 47-9308; (b) Fixtures in section 47-9334; (c) Fixture filings in sections 47-9501, 47-9502, 47-9512, 47-9516 and 47-9519; and (d) Security agreements covering personal and real property in section 47-9604; 12. An assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than a commercial tort claim, but sections 47-9315 and 47-9322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds; 13. An assignment of a deposit account in a consumer transaction, but sections 47-9315 and 47-9322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds; 14. A transfer, pledge, assignment, grant or similar action by this state, another state or a governmental unit of this state or another state; 15. A claim or right to receive compensation for injuries or sickness as described in 26 United States Code section 104a(1) or (2); or 16. A claim or right to receive benefits under a special needs trust as described in 42 United States Code section 1396p(d)(4); or 17. A security interest that is subject to section 30-1006 or 40-607. END_STATUTE